New York, session 2025-2026, S1616.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 364-j of the social services law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (x) to read as follows: 3 (x) Managed care providers shall pay, directly or indirectly, for 4 durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and related supplies 5 at no less than one hundred percent of the medical assistance durable 6 medical equipment and complex rehabilitation technology fee schedule for 7 the same service or item. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to subdivision 10 4 of section 364-j of the social services law made by section one of 11 this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed 12 repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04119-01-5